Florida, session 2026, SB1524.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 21 22 Section 1.âParagraph (c) of subsection (9) of section 23 460.403, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 24 460.403âDefinitions.âAs used in this chapter, the term: 25 (9) 26 (c)1.âChiropractic physicians may adjust, manipulate, or 27 treat the human body by manual, mechanical, electrical, or 28 natural methods; by the use of physical means or physiotherapy, 29 including light, heat, water, or exercise; by the use of 30 acupuncture; by the use of monofilament intramuscular 31 stimulation treatment, also known as dry needling, for trigger 32 points or myofascial pain; or by the administration of foods, 33 food concentrates, food extracts, and items for which a 34 prescription is not required and may apply first aid and 35 hygiene, but chiropractic physicians are expressly prohibited 36 from prescribing or administering to any person any legend drug 37 except as authorized under subparagraph 2., from performing any 38 surgery except as stated herein, or from practicing obstetrics. 39 2.âNotwithstanding the prohibition against prescribing and 40 administering legend drugs under subparagraph 1. or s. 41 499.83(2)(c), pursuant to board rule chiropractic physicians may 42 order, store, possess, prescribe, and administer vitamins, 43 nutrient preparations, homeopathic remedies, and dietary 44 supplements in the form of sterile substances by means of 45 injection but not by means of intravenous therapy;, for 46 emergency purposes only at the chiropractic physicianâs office 47 or place of business, prescription medical oxygen and 48 prescription epinephrine using an autoinjector delivery system; 49 and may also order, store, and administer the following topical 50 anesthetics in aerosol form: 51 a.âAny solution consisting of 25 percent ethyl chloride 52 ethylchloride and 75 percent dichlorodifluoromethane. 53 b.âAny solution consisting of 15 percent 54 dichlorodifluoromethane and 85 percent 55 trichloromonofluoromethane. 56 3.âA chiropractic physician may only administer by 57 injection vitamins, nutrient preparations, homeopathic remedies, 58 dietary supplements, or epinephrine after being certified by the 59 board. Certification shall be granted to a chiropractic 60 physician who has satisfactorily completed at least 36 hours of 61 education and training as established by board rule and 62 successfully passed an examination administered by the 63 department in collaboration with the board. The certification 64 program shall consist of didactic lectures and laboratory 65 training on the safe and effective administration of vitamins, 66 nutrient preparations, homeopathic remedies, dietary 67 supplements, and epinephrine, including, but not limited to, 68 protocols, indications, contraindications, and emergency 69 procedures. 70 4.âLicensed pharmacists may fill, compound, or dispense 71 prescriptions of vitamins, nutrient preparations, homeopathic 72 remedies, and dietary supplements prescribed by certified 73 licensed chiropractic physicians. 74 75 However, this paragraph does not authorize a chiropractic 76 physician to prescribe medical oxygen as defined in s. 77 499.82(10). 78 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.